Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.442

Statewide information technology system maintenance and operations revolving account—Contracts for administration, maintenance, and operations of enterprise information technology systems.

(1) The statewide information technology system maintenance and operations revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees, charges for services, and assessments to agencies for the maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems must be deposited into the account. The account must be used solely for the maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems.

(2) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditure.

(3) The office may contract with Washington technology solutions for the billing of fees, charges for services, and assessments to agencies, and for the maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems.

(4) "Enterprise information technology system" has the definition in RCW 43.41.440.

[ 2024 c 54 s 43; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 503.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.